Utah statutes.
20A-4-103.   Preparing ballot sheets for the counting center.

(1) (a)  In voting precincts using ballot sheets, as soon as the polls have been closed and the last qualified voter has voted, the poll workers shall prepare the ballot sheets for delivery to the counting center as provided in this section.

(b)  The poll workers, election officers, and other persons may not manually count any votes before delivering the ballots to the counting center.

(2)  The poll workers shall:

(a)  place all of the provisional ballot envelopes in the envelope or container provided for them for return to the counting center; and

(b)  seal that envelope or container.

(3) (a)  The poll workers shall check each secrecy envelope to see if either contains any write-in votes.

(b)  If a secrecy envelope does not contain any write-in votes, the poll workers shall remove the ballot sheet from the secrecy envelope.

(c)  If a secrecy envelope contains any write-in votes, the poll workers may not separate the ballot sheet from the secrecy envelope.

(4)  The poll workers shall place:

(a)  the voted ballot sheets and one copy of the statement of disposition of ballots in the transfer case;

(b)  the other copy of the statement of disposition of ballots, the pollbook, any unprocessed absentee ballots, the poll workers' pay vouchers, the official register, and the spoiled ballot envelope in the carrier envelope provided; and

(c)  the other election materials in the election supply box.



Amended by Chapter 326, 2006 General Session

